Tennessee statutes. Title 60 Oil And Gas
Part 4

Violations

60-1-401. Violations — Penalties — Notice — Appeals — Hearing. [Current version. See second version of section and the Compiler's Notes.]

The Tennessee board of water quality, oil and gas through the supervisor shall have the authority to assess monetary penalties as provided in subsections (c)-(e) for any violation of this chapter, rules and regulations, or any order adopted by the board. In making such assessment, the board shall give due consideration to the appropriateness of the penalty with respect to the size of the business of the operator charged, the gravity of the violation, the good faith of the operator, and the operator's history of previous violations.

If, upon an inspection or investigation, the supervisor or any of the supervisor's authorized personnel shall determine that any operator is not in compliance with any standard or regulation or rule or order of the board promulgated by the board pursuant to this chapter, the supervisor shall with reasonable promptness and in no event later than six (6) months following the inspection, issue to the operator by certified mail a written citation that states the nature and, if appropriate, the location of the violation, including a reference to the provision of the chapter and the regulation alleged to have been violated. In addition, the citation shall fix a reasonable time for abatement of the violation. If the issuing supervisor has reason to believe that such violation, or the failure to abate such violation, should result in the assessment of a penalty under subsections (c)-(e), the citation may so state.

Any operator who has received a citation for a violation of this chapter, rules and regulations or order of the board, promulgated pursuant to this chapter and has failed to correct such violation within the period of correction of this citation, shall be assessed a penalty of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each day the violation exists. The period of correction may be suspended or lengthened by the assessing party upon a showing by the operator of a good faith effort to comply with the correction requirements and that failure to comply with the correction requirements is due to factors beyond the operator's reasonable control.

Any operator who has received a citation for a violation of this chapter, or rules and regulations or order of the board, and such violation is specifically determined not to be of a serious nature, may be assessed a penalty of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each such violation.

Any operator who willfully or repeatedly violates the requirements of this chapter, or rules and regulations, or order of the board promulgated pursuant to this chapter may be assessed a penalty of up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each violation.

Penalties provided for by subsections (c)-(e) shall be imposed in the manner hereinafter provided. Whenever the Tennessee board of water quality, oil and gas, through the supervisor, has determined that such a penalty should be assessed against an operator, a written notice and assessment of a penalty shall be issued to the operator by certified mail, return receipt requested, stating the amount of the penalty to be assessed and the reason therefor (which may be done by reference to citations issued prior to or simultaneously with such notification).

Any citation or notice and assessment of a penalty issued pursuant to this section shall inform the operator of the operator's right to appeal such citation or assessment of a penalty to the Tennessee board of water quality, oil and gas. Any such citation or assessment of a penalty shall become final twenty (20) days after the receipt of such citation or notice and assessment of penalty by the operator unless the operator, within the period of twenty (20) days, shall file a written notice of appeal with the supervisor.

If the operator files an appeal of such citation or assessment of a penalty as provided by subsection (g), the proceedings on such appeal shall be conducted as a contested case and shall be heard before an administrative judge sitting alone pursuant to §§ 4-5-301(a)(2) and 4-5-314(b), unless settled by the parties. The administrative judge to whom the case has been assigned shall convene the parties for a scheduling conference within thirty (30) days of the date the appeal is filed. The scheduling order for the contested case issued by the administrative judge shall establish a schedule that results in a hearing being completed within one hundred eighty (180) days of the scheduling conference, unless the parties agree to a longer time or the administrative judge allows otherwise for good cause shown, and an initial order being issued within sixty (60) days of completion of the record of the hearing. The administrative judge's initial order, together with any earlier orders issued by the administrative judge, shall become final unless appealed to the board by the commissioner or other party within thirty (30) days of entry of the initial order or, unless the board passes a motion to review the initial order pursuant to § 4-5-315, within the longer of thirty (30) days or seven (7) days after the first board meeting to occur after entry of the initial order. Upon appeal to the board by a party, or upon passage of a motion of the board to review the administrative judge's initial order, the board shall afford each party an opportunity to present briefs, shall review the record and allow each party an opportunity to present oral argument. If appealed to the board, the review of the administrative judge's initial order shall be limited to the record, but shall be de novo with no presumption of correctness. In such appeals, the board shall thereafter render a final order, in accordance with § 4-5-314, affirming, modifying, remanding, or vacating the supervisor's citation or assessment of a penalty. A final order rendered pursuant to this section is effective upon its entry, except as provided in § 4-5-320(b) unless a later effective date shall be stated therein. A petition to stay the effective date of a final order may be filed under § 4-5-316. A petition for reconsideration of a final order may be filed pursuant to § 4-5-317. Judicial review of a final order may be sought by filing a petition for review in accordance with § 4-5-322. An order of an administrative judge that becomes final in the absence of an appeal or review by the board shall be deemed to be a decision of the board in that case for purposes of the standard of review by a court; provided, however, that in other matters before the board, it may be considered but shall not be binding on the board.

Acts 1978, ch. 791, § 1; T.C.A., § 60-113; Acts 1984, ch. 700, §§ 1, 2; 2007, ch. 362, § 8; 2013, ch. 181, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 986, § 29 substituted “Tennessee board of water quality, oil, and gas” for “oil and gas board”.

Acts 2013, ch 181, § 19 provided that for the purpose of construing the act in relation to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, the act shall be deemed to be procedural in nature. It is the intent of the general assembly that Acts 2013, chapter 181 and the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act shall be complied with; however, when in conflict, the provisions of Acts 2013, chapter 181 shall govern.

Acts 2013, ch 181, § 20 provided that the act, which amended subsection (h), shall apply to all cases filed on or after July 1, 2013.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court Systems — Prosecution, 8 Mem. St. L. Rev. 477.

60-1-401. Violations — Penalties — Notice — Appeals — Hearing. [Contingent amendment. See first version of section and Compiler's Notes.]

The Tennessee board of energy and natural resources through the supervisor shall have the authority to assess monetary penalties as provided in subsections (c)-(e) for any violation of this chapter, rules and regulations, or any order adopted by the board. In making such assessment, the board shall give due consideration to the appropriateness of the penalty with respect to the size of the business of the operator charged, the gravity of the violation, the good faith of the operator, and the operator's history of previous violations.

If, upon an inspection or investigation, the supervisor or any of the supervisor's authorized personnel shall determine that any operator is not in compliance with any standard or regulation or rule or order of the board promulgated by the board pursuant to this chapter, the supervisor shall with reasonable promptness and in no event later than six (6) months following the inspection, issue to the operator by certified mail a written citation that states the nature and, if appropriate, the location of the violation, including a reference to the provision of the chapter and the regulation alleged to have been violated. In addition, the citation shall fix a reasonable time for abatement of the violation. If the issuing supervisor has reason to believe that such violation, or the failure to abate such violation, should result in the assessment of a penalty under subsections (c)-(e), the citation may so state.

Any operator who has received a citation for a violation of this chapter, rules and regulations or order of the board, promulgated pursuant to this chapter and has failed to correct such violation within the period of correction of this citation, shall be assessed a penalty of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each day the violation exists. The period of correction may be suspended or lengthened by the assessing party upon a showing by the operator of a good faith effort to comply with the correction requirements and that failure to comply with the correction requirements is due to factors beyond the operator's reasonable control.

Any operator who has received a citation for a violation of this chapter, or rules and regulations or order of the board, and such violation is specifically determined not to be of a serious nature, may be assessed a penalty of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each such violation.

Any operator who willfully or repeatedly violates the requirements of this chapter, or rules and regulations, or order of the board promulgated pursuant to this chapter may be assessed a penalty of up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each violation.

Penalties provided for by subsections (c)-(e) shall be imposed in the manner hereinafter provided. Whenever the Tennessee board of energy and natural resources, through the supervisor, has determined that such a penalty should be assessed against an operator, a written notice and assessment of a penalty shall be issued to the operator by certified mail, return receipt requested, stating the amount of the penalty to be assessed and the reason therefor (which may be done by reference to citations issued prior to or simultaneously with such notification).

Any citation or notice and assessment of a penalty issued pursuant to this section shall inform the operator of the operator's right to appeal such citation or assessment of a penalty to the Tennessee board of energy and natural resources. Any such citation or assessment of a penalty shall become final twenty (20) days after the receipt of such citation or notice and assessment of penalty by the operator unless the operator, within the period of twenty (20) days, shall file a written notice of appeal with the supervisor.

If the operator files an appeal of such citation or assessment of a penalty as provided by subsection (g), the proceedings on such appeal shall be conducted as a contested case and shall be heard before an administrative judge sitting alone pursuant to §§ 4-5-301(a)(2) and 4-5-314(b), unless settled by the parties. The administrative judge to whom the case has been assigned shall convene the parties for a scheduling conference within thirty (30) days of the date the appeal is filed. The scheduling order for the contested case issued by the administrative judge shall establish a schedule that results in a hearing being completed within one hundred eighty (180) days of the scheduling conference, unless the parties agree to a longer time or the administrative judge allows otherwise for good cause shown, and an initial order being issued within sixty (60) days of completion of the record of the hearing. The administrative judge's initial order, together with any earlier orders issued by the administrative judge, shall become final unless appealed to the board by the commissioner or other party within thirty (30) days of entry of the initial order or, unless the board passes a motion to review the initial order pursuant to § 4-5-315, within the longer of thirty (30) days or seven (7) days after the first board meeting to occur after entry of the initial order. Upon appeal to the board by a party, or upon passage of a motion of the board to review the administrative judge's initial order, the board shall afford each party an opportunity to present briefs, shall review the record and allow each party an opportunity to present oral argument. If appealed to the board, the review of the administrative judge's initial order shall be limited to the record, but shall be de novo with no presumption of correctness. In such appeals, the board shall thereafter render a final order, in accordance with § 4-5-314, affirming, modifying, remanding, or vacating the supervisor's citation or assessment of a penalty. A final order rendered pursuant to this section is effective upon its entry, except as provided in § 4-5-320(b) unless a later effective date shall be stated therein. A petition to stay the effective date of a final order may be filed under § 4-5-316. A petition for reconsideration of a final order may be filed pursuant to § 4-5-317. Judicial review of a final order may be sought by filing a petition for review in accordance with § 4-5-322. An order of an administrative judge that becomes final in the absence of an appeal or review by the board shall be deemed to be a decision of the board in that case for purposes of the standard of review by a court; provided, however, that in other matters before the board, it may be considered but shall not be binding on the board.

Acts 1978, ch. 791, § 1; T.C.A., § 60-113; Acts 1984, ch. 700, §§ 1, 2; 2007, ch. 362, § 8; 2013, ch. 181, § 1; 2018, ch. 839, § 15.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 986, § 29 substituted “Tennessee board of water quality, oil, and gas” for “oil and gas board”.

Acts 2013, ch 181, § 19 provided that for the purpose of construing the act in relation to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, the act shall be deemed to be procedural in nature. It is the intent of the general assembly that Acts 2013, chapter 181 and the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act shall be complied with; however, when in conflict, the provisions of Acts 2013, chapter 181 shall govern.

Acts 2013, ch 181, § 20 provided that the act, which amended subsection (h), shall apply to all cases filed on or after July 1, 2013.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 44 provided that the governor shall take all action necessary to prepare and submit for approval all necessary requests for federal grant funding and applications for authorization to the appropriate federal authority to obtain exclusive jurisdiction over surface coal mining and reclamation operations and the maximum federal money available for those purposes in an expeditious manner.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 45 provided that the commissioner of environment and conservation shall notify the secretary of state and the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission of the date this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall take effect, including for purposes of rulemaking, upon the deposit of federal funds in the Coal Mining Protection Fund.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment substituted “board of energy and natural resources” for “board of water quality, oil and gas” throughout. See the Compiler’s Notes.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47. [See Compiler's Notes.]

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court Systems — Prosecution, 8 Mem. St. L. Rev. 477.

60-1-402. Restraining violations.

Whenever it shall appear that any person is violating or threatening to violate any provisions of this chapter, or any rule, regulation or order made hereunder, and unless the board without litigation can effectively prevent further violation or threat of violation, then the board, through the attorney general, who may call to the attorney general's assistance the district attorney general of the district in which suit is instituted, shall bring suit in the name of the state of Tennessee against such person in the circuit or chancery court in the county of the residence of the defendant, or if there be more than one (1) defendant, in the circuit or chancery court in the county of the residence of any of same, or in the circuit or chancery court in the county in which such violation is alleged to have occurred, to restrain such person from continuing such violation or from carrying out the threat of violation. In such suit the board, in the name of the state of Tennessee, may obtain an injunction prohibitory and mandatory, including temporary restraining orders and temporary injunctions as the facts may warrant.

Acts 1943, ch. 64, § 8; C. Supp. 1950, § 5240.8; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 60-114.

Law Reviews.

Conservation of Oil and Gas in Tennessee (Phillip J. Sheehe), 41 Tenn. L. Rev. 323.

60-1-403. Right to damages unimpaired.

Nothing in this chapter contained or authorized and no suit by or against the board and no penalties imposed or claimed against any person for violating any provision of this chapter, or any rule, regulation or order issued hereunder, and no forfeiture shall impair or abridge or delay any cause of action for damages which any person may have or assert against any person violating any provisions of this chapter or any rule, regulation or order issued hereunder. Any person so damaged by the violation may sue for and recover such damages as the person may show that the person is entitled to receive.

Acts 1943, ch. 64, § 9; C. Supp. 1950, § 5240.9; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 60-115.

60-1-404. Tennessee board of water quality, oil and gas reclamation fund.
[See contingent amendment to subsection (a) and the Compiler’s Notes.]

[Current version. See second version for contingent amendment and the Compiler's Notes.]

All sums received in payment of penalties assessed by the board pursuant to this part shall be placed in the state treasury in a separate account to be designated as the Tennessee board of water quality, oil and gas reclamation fund.

[Contingent amendment. See the Compiler's Notes.]

This fund shall be available to the board for expenditure for site protection and reclamation work on land and waters damaged by surface disturbances. The fund may be expended for such work following default and notice of forfeiture of bond, if the bond furnished by the operator is not sufficient to cover the cost of reclamation. It may also be expended for such work if the operations which caused the damage were not covered by the bond, including operations conducted before January 1, 1988.

This fund shall also be available to the board for expenditure for the plugging of dry or abandoned wells. The fund may be expended for such work, following default and notice of forfeiture, if the bond furnished by the operator is not sufficient to cover the cost of plugging. It also may be expended to plug dry or abandoned wells not covered by a bond, including wells drilled before January 1, 1988.

Any unencumbered or unexpended balance of this fund remaining at the end of any fiscal year together with any interest earned thereon shall not revert to the general fund, but shall be carried forward until expended for the purpose of site protection and reclamation or the plugging of dry or abandoned wells, as provided in this section.

All sums received in payment of penalties assessed by the board pursuant to this part shall be placed in the state treasury in a separate account to be designated as the Tennessee board of energy and natural resources reclamation fund.

Acts 1987, ch. 257, § 4; 2007, ch. 362, § 9; 2013, ch. 94, § 1; 2018, ch. 839, § 16.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 44 provided that the governor shall take all action necessary to prepare and submit for approval all necessary requests for federal grant funding and applications for authorization to the appropriate federal authority to obtain exclusive jurisdiction over surface coal mining and reclamation operations and the maximum federal money available for those purposes in an expeditious manner.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 45 provided that the commissioner of environment and conservation shall notify the secretary of state and the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission of the date this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall take effect, including for purposes of rulemaking, upon the deposit of federal funds in the Coal Mining Protection Fund.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment substituted “board of energy and natural resources” for “board of water quality, oil and gas” in (a). See the Compiler’s Notes.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47. [See Compiler's Notes.]